Maryland, session 2026, SB0554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0554*

SENATE BILL 554
3–108.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Board” means the Baltimore City Board of School Commissioners of
the Baltimore City Public School System.
(3) “Mayor” means the Mayor of Baltimore City.
[(4) “Panel” means the Baltimore City Public School Board Community
Panel.
(b) (1) There is a Baltimore City Public School Board Community Panel.
(2) The purpose of the panel is to select nominees to be recommended to
the Mayor as qualified candidates for appointment to the board.
(3) The Mayor shall convene the panel.
(4) The panel may include a representative from each of the following
organizations, appointed by the organization:
(i) The Baltimore Teachers Union;
(ii) The Mayor’s Office;
(iii) The Baltimore City Council Education and Youth Committee;
(iv) The Baltimore City Public School Administrators and
Supervisors Association;
(v) The Maryland Alliance of Public Charter Schools;
(vi) The Downtown Baltimore Family Alliance;
(vii) The Fund for Educational Excellence;
(viii) A parent member of the PTA Council of Baltimore City;
(ix) The American Federation of State, County, and Municipal
Employees (AFSCME);
(x) The Associated Student Congress of Baltimore City;
(xi) The American Civil Liberties Union;
(xii) The Parent and Community Advisory Board; and

SENATE BILL 554 3
(xiii) Disability Rights Maryland.
(5) The Mayor may reconvene the panel if the Mayor elects not to appoint
a member from the list submitted by the panel under subsection (d)(1)(i) or (i)(6) of this
section.]
(B) (1) THE MAYOR SHALL HOLD A PUBLIC HEARING TO SELECT
QUALIFIED CANDIDATES FOR APPOINTMENT TO THE BOARD.
(2) THE MAYOR SHALL PROVIDE AT LEAST 10 DAYS’ NOTICE IN
ADVANCE OF THE HEARING, POSTED ELECTRONICALLY ON THE BALTIMORE CITY
PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM WEBSITE, TO GIVE GROUPS IN LAW AND INTERESTED
PERSONS AN OPPORTUNITY TO PRESENT THEIR VIEWS INCLUDING:
(I) THE AMERICAN FEDERATION OF STATE, COUNTY, AND
MUNICIPAL EMPLOYEES (AFSCME);
(II) THE AMERICAN CIVIL LIBERTIES UNION;
(III) ASSOCIATED BLACK CHARITIES;
(IV) THE ASSOCIATED STUDENT CONGRESS OF BALTIMORE
CITY;
(V) THE BALTIMORE CHAPTER OF THE NAACP;
(VI) THE BALTIMORE CITY COUNCIL EDUCATION, YOUTH, AND
OLDER ADULTS COMMITTEE;
(VII) THE BALTIMORE CITY PUBLIC SCHOOL ADMINISTRATORS
AND SUPERVISORS ASSOCIATION;
(VIII) THE BALTIMORE MINISTER CONFERENCE;
(IX) THE BALTIMORE PANHELLENIC COUNCIL;
(X) THE BALTIMORE TEACHERS UNION;
(XI) BALTIMOREANS UNITED IN LEADERSHIP DEVELOPMENT
(BUILD);
(XII) DISABILITY RIGHTS MARYLAND;
(XIII) THE DOWNTOWN BALTIMORE FAMILY ALLIANCE;

SENATE BILL 554
(XIV) THE ECUMENICAL LEADERS GROUP;
(XV) THE ESPERANZA CENTER;
(XVI) THE FEATHERSTONE FOUNDATION;
(XVII) THE FUND FOR EDUCATIONAL EXCELLENCE;
(XVIII) THE GRAND LODGE OF THE PRINCE HALL MASONS;
(XIX) THE GREATER BALTIMORE COMMITTEE;
(XX) THE GREATER BALTIMORE URBAN LEAGUE;
(XXI) THE INTERDENOMINATIONAL MINISTERIAL ALLIANCE;
(XXII) THE JEWISH COMMUNITY CENTER;
(XXIII) THE JEWISH FEDERATION OF BALTIMORE;
(XXIV) JEWS UNITED FOR JUSTICE;
(XXV) LATINA FORWARD;
(XXVI) LEADERS OF A BEAUTIFUL STRUGGLE;
(XXVII) MARYLAND CASA;
(XXVIII) THE MARYLAND ALLIANCE OF PUBLIC CHARTER
SCHOOLS;
(XXIX) THE MAYOR’S OFFICE;
(XXX) THE MUSLIM CULTURAL CENTER OF BALTIMORE;
(XXXI) THE PARENT AND COMMUNITY ADVISORY BOARD;
(XXXII) THE PTA COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY;
(XXXIII) SOCCER WITHOUT BORDERS;
(XXXIV) EACH NEIGHBORHOOD ASSOCIATION LISTED IN THE
BALTIMORE CITY DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING’S COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION
DIRECTORY; AND

SENATE BILL 554 5
(XXXV) MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC AT LARGE.
(3) A GROUP LISTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
MAY SUBMIT ITS PREFERRED RANKING OF BOARD CANDIDATES TO THE MAYOR
BEFORE AN APPOINTMENT.
(4) NOT LESS THAN 7 DAYS AFTER THE HEARING AND SUBJECT TO
CONFIRMATION BY THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, THE MAYOR MAY APPOINT A
MEMBER TO THE BOARD.
[(c)] (B) There is a Baltimore City Board of School Commissioners of the
Baltimore City Public School System.
[(d)] (C) [(1)] The board consists of:
[(i)] (1) [Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection,]
SUBJECT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION AND SUBJECT
TO CONFIRMATION BY THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, nine voting members appointed by
the Mayor [from a list of qualified individuals submitted to the Mayor by the panel];
[(ii)] (2) Two elected voting members; and
[(iii)] (3) One voting student member elected as provided in
subsection [(m)] (L) of this section.
[(2) If the Mayor elects not to appoint a member from a list submitted by
the panel under paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection, the Mayor shall reconvene the panel to
submit additional names of qualified candidates.]
[(e)] (D) Each member of the board shall be a resident of Baltimore City.
[(f)] (E) The two elected voting members shall be elected at large by the voters
of Baltimore City.
[(g)] (F) To the extent practicable, the appointed members of the board shall
reflect the demographic composition of Baltimore City.
[(h)] (G) (1) At least four of the appointed voting members shall possess a
high level of knowledge and expertise concerning the successful administration of a large
business, nonprofit, or governmental entity and shall have served in a high level
management position within such an entity.
(2) At least three of the appointed voting members shall possess a high
level of knowledge and expertise concerning education.

SENATE BILL 554
(3) At least one appointed voting member shall be a parent of a student
enrolled in the Baltimore City Public School System as of the date of appointment of the
member.
(4) (i) Among the appointed voting members, at least one member shall
also possess knowledge or experience in the education of children with disabilities.
(ii) The knowledge or experience may be derived from being the
parent of a child with a disability.
[(i)] (H) (1) (i) The term of an appointed voting member is 3 years.
(ii) The term of an elected member is 4 years.
(2) The terms of the appointed voting members are staggered as required
by the terms provided for the appointed members of the board on June 1, 1997.
(3) At the end of a term, a voting member continues to serve until a
successor is elected or appointed and qualifies.
(4) A voting member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only
for the remainder of the term and until a successor is elected or appointed and qualifies.
(5) A voting member may not serve more than two consecutive full terms.
(6) [(i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, to the
extent practicable, the] THE Mayor, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION AND SUBJECT TO CONFIRMATION BY THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, shall fill
any vacancy for an appointed or elected member on the board within 60 days of the date of
the vacancy [from a list of qualified individuals submitted to the Mayor by the panel.
(ii) If the Mayor elects not to appoint a member from a list submitted
by the panel under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Mayor shall reconvene the panel
to submit additional names of qualified candidates].
(7) The elected members of the board shall be elected:
(i) At the general election in November 2022 and every 4 years
thereafter; and
(ii) In accordance with Title 8, Subtitle 8 of the Election Law Article.
[(j)] (I) (1) On the approval of the Mayor, an appointed member may be
removed only for cause in accordance with § 3–108 of this subtitle.

SENATE BILL 554 7
(2) The State Board may remove an elected voting member for:
(i) Immorality;
(ii) Misconduct in office;
(iii) Incompetency; or
(iv) Willful neglect of duty.
[(k)] (J) (1) Each member of the board serves without compensation,
EXCEPT FOR THE STUDENT MEMBER, IS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE $10,000 ANNUALLY
AS COMPENSATION.
(2) (I) A STUDENT MEMBER WHO COMPLETES A FULL TERM ON
THE BOARD SHALL BE GRANTED A SCHOLARSHIP OF $10,000 TO BE APPLIED
TOWARD COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH HIGHER EDUCATION OR A REGISTERED
APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM FOR THE STUDENT.
(II) THE SCHOLARSHIP SHALL BE PAID DIRECTLY TO THE
EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION OR REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM THAT
THE STUDENT ATTENDS.
(III) THE SCHOLARSHIP MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED
COMPENSATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF CALCULATING TAXABLE INCOME.
[(l)] (K) Beginning on July 1, 1999, and every 2 years thereafter, from among
its voting members the board shall elect a chairman.
[(m)] (L) (1) The student member shall be a student regularly enrolled in the
student’s junior or senior year of high school in the Baltimore City Public School System
who shall be elected by the high school students of the Baltimore City Public School System,
in accordance with procedures established by the board in collaboration with the Associated
Student Congress of Baltimore City.
(2) The term of a student member is 1 year.
(3) A student member may not serve more than two consecutive full terms.
(4) The student member may vote on matters before the board, including
those relating to:
(i) Capital and operating budgets;
(ii) School closings, reopenings, and boundaries; and

SENATE BILL 554
(iii) Student disciplinary matters.
(5) The student member may not vote on matters before the board relating
to personnel and collective bargaining decisions.
(6) The student member may attend or participate in an executive or
special session of the board.
[(n)] (M) Any action by the board shall require:
(1) A quorum of a majority of the voting members then serving; and
(2) The affirmative vote of a majority of the voting members then serving.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the requirement that
appointed members of and members appointed to fill a vacancy on the Baltimore City Board
of School Commissioners be appointed subject to confirmation by the Senate of Maryland
in accordance with § 3–108.1 of the Education Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act,
shall apply to appointed members and members appointed to fill a vacancy after the
effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.